Utah statutes.
32A-1-303 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Additional requirements when age is in question.

(1)  In addition to requesting the presentation of proof of age under Section 32A-1-302, any person authorized to sell or otherwise handle alcoholic beverages or products shall require any person whose age is in question to sign a statement of age on the form provided under Subsection (2) that includes:

(a)  the date the statement of age is signed; and

(b)  the number assigned to the person's proof of age by the issuing authority.

(2) (a)  At the request of a licensee, the commissioner of public safety shall provide to a licensee under this title the form for the statement of age described in Subsection (1).

(b)  The person authorized to sell or otherwise handle alcoholic beverages or products shall:

(i)  file in alphabetical order any statement of age obtained under Subsection (1) by no later than  the close of business on the day on which the statement is executed; and

(ii)  maintain on file for three years any statement of age obtained under Subsection (1).

(c)  The statement of age obtained under Subsection (1) is subject to examination by:

(i)  a peace officer;

(ii)  a representative of the State Bureau of Investigation of the Department of Public Safety, established in Section 53-10-301; or

(iii)  an authorized employee of the department.

